Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.55.040

Concealing identity of source of payment prohibited—Exception. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

No payment shall be made to any person required to report under RCW 29B.55.010 and no payment shall be accepted by any such person, directly or indirectly, in a fictitious name, anonymously, or by one person through an agent, relative, or other person in such a manner as to conceal the identity of the source of the payment or in any other manner so as to effect concealment. The commission may issue categorical and specific exemptions to the reporting of the actual source when there is an undisclosed principal for recognized legitimate business purposes.

[ 2024 c 164 s 489; 2010 c 204 s 904; 1977 ex.s. c 336 s 4. Formerly RCW 42.17A.715, 42.17.242.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 336: See note following RCW 29B.25.020.